Maryland, session 2025, HB1078.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
7–110.1.
IF THE U.S. GENERAL SERVICES ADMINISTRATION RELOCATES APPLIES TO
PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY OR THE STATE FOR A PERMIT ASSOCIATED WITH THE
RELOCATION OF THE FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION HEADQUARTERS TO
PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL
OPERATING OR CAPITAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF AT LEAST
$200,000,000 FOR SITE REDEVELOPMENT AND TO IMPROVE TRANSPORTATION
INFRASTRUCTURE FOR THE FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION HEADQUARTERS
RELOCATION PROJECT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.